analyzer/noun-irreg.lexc
! noun-irreg.lexc
!
! We explicitly list the plural inflection of irregular plurals here.
!
! Note that angle brackets (< and >) are special symbols in lexc
! language. They need to be escaped using the percentage sign.
!
! Also note that lexc expands all sequences, treating each character
! as a symbol in the resulting FST. To keep the analysis symbols
! <N>, <PL> and <SG> as single symbols, we define them as
! Multichar_Symbols below. You can do without multi-char
! symbols as well, but they often make transitions more readable.
!

Multichar_Symbols %<N%> %<PL%> %<SG%>

LEXICON Root
mouse%<N%>%<PL%>:mice   #;
mouse%<N%>%<SG%>:mouse  #;
sheep%<N%>%<SG%>:sheep  #;
sheep%<N%>%<PL%>:sheep  #;
fish%<N%>%<PL%>:fish    #;
monarch%<N%>%<PL%>:monarchs #;
monarch%<N%>%<SG%>:monarch  #;
